New Jersey, session 222, S3884.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 2 of P.L.1994, c.133 (C.2C:7-2) is amended to read as follows: 2.    a. (1) A person who has been convicted, adjudicated delinquent or found not guilty by reason of insanity for commission of a sex offense as defined in subsection b. of this section shall register as provided in subsections c. and d. of this section. (2)   A person who in another jurisdiction is required to register as a sex offender and (a) is enrolled on a full-time or part-time basis in any public or private educational institution in this State, including any secondary school, trade or professional institution, institution of higher education or other post-secondary school, or (b) is employed or carries on a vocation in this State, on either a full-time or a part-time basis, with or without compensation, for more than 14 consecutive days or for an aggregate period exceeding 30 days in a calendar year, shall register in this State as provided in subsections c. and d. of this section. (3)   A person who fails to register as required under this act shall be guilty of a crime of the third degree. b.    For the purposes of this act a sex offense shall include the following: (1)   Aggravated sexual assault, sexual assault, aggravated criminal sexual contact, kidnapping pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection c. of N.J.S.2C:13-1 or an attempt to commit any of these crimes if the court found that the offender's conduct was characterized by a pattern of repetitive, compulsive behavior, regardless of the date of the commission of the offense or the date of conviction; (2)   A conviction, adjudication of delinquency, or acquittal by reason of insanity for aggravated sexual assault; sexual assault; aggravated criminal sexual contact; kidnapping pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection c. of N.J.S.2C:13-1; endangering the welfare of a child by engaging in sexual conduct which would impair or debauch the morals of the child pursuant to subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:24-4; endangering the welfare of a child pursuant to paragraph (3) or (4), subparagraph (a), or sub-subparagraph (i) or (ii) of subparagraph (b) of paragraph (5) of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:24-4; luring or enticing pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1993, c.291 (C.2C:13-6); criminal sexual contact pursuant to N.J.S.2C:14-3b. if the victim is a minor; kidnapping pursuant to N.J.S.2C:13-1, criminal restraint pursuant to N.J.S.2C:13-2, or false imprisonment pursuant to N.J.S.2C:13-3 if the victim is a minor and the offender is not the parent of the victim; knowingly promoting prostitution of a child pursuant to paragraph (3) or paragraph (4) of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:34-1; leader of a network to share child sexual abuse or exploitation material pursuant to section 8 of P.L.2017, c.141 (C.2C:24-4.1); or an attempt to commit any of these enumerated offenses if the conviction, adjudication of delinquency or acquittal by reason of insanity is entered on or after the effective date of this act or the offender is serving a sentence of incarceration, probation, parole or other form of community supervision as a result of the offense or is confined following acquittal by reason of insanity or as a result of civil commitment on the effective date of this act; (3)   A conviction, adjudication of delinquency, or acquittal by reason of insanity for an offense similar to any offense enumerated in paragraph (2) or a sentence on the basis of criteria similar to the criteria set forth in paragraph (1) of this subsection entered or imposed under the laws of the United States, this State, or another state. (4) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection, a sex offense shall not include an adjudication of delinquency for endangering the welfare of a child pursuant to paragraph (4) or (5) of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:24-4, provided that the actor demonstrates that: (a)   the facts of the case are limited to the creation, exhibition or distribution of a photograph depicting nudity or portraying a child in a sexually suggestive manner, as defined in N.J.S.2C:24-4, through the use of an electronic communications device, an interactive wireless communications device, or a computer; (b)   the creator and subject of the photograph are juveniles or were juveniles at the time of its making; and (c)   the subject of the photograph whose nudity is depicted or who is portrayed in a sexually suggestive manner, as the case may be, knowingly consented to the making of the photograph. c.    A person required to register under the provisions of this act shall do so on forms to be provided by the designated registering agency as follows: (1)   A person who is required to register and who is under supervision in the community on probation, parole, furlough, work release, or a similar program, shall register at the time the person is placed under supervision or no later than 120 days after the effective date of this act, whichever is later, in accordance with procedures established by the Department of Corrections, the Department of Human Services, the Youth Justice Commission established pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1995, c.284 (C.52:17B-170) or the Administrative Office of the Courts, whichever is responsible for supervision; (2)   A person confined in a correctional or juvenile facility or involuntarily committed who is required to register shall register prior to release in accordance with procedures established by the Department of Corrections, the Department of Human Services or the Youth Justice Commission and, within 48 hours of release, shall also register with the chief law enforcement officer of the municipality in which the person resides or, if the municipality does not have a local police force, the Superintendent of State Police; (3)   A person moving to or returning to this State from another jurisdiction shall register with the chief law enforcement officer of the municipality in which the person will reside or, if the municipality does not have a local police force, the Superintendent of State Police within 120 days of the effective date of this act or not less than 10 days [of] before first residing in or returning to a municipality in this State, whichever is later; (4)   A person required to register on the basis of a conviction prior to the effective date who is not confined or under supervision on the effective date of this act shall register within 120 days of the effective date of this act with the chief law enforcement officer of the municipality in which the person will reside or, if the municipality does not have a local police force, the Superintendent of State Police; (5)   A person who in another jurisdiction is required to register as a sex offender and who is enrolled on a full-time or part-time basis in any public or private educational institution in this State, including any secondary school, trade or professional institution, institution of higher education or other post-secondary school shall, [within ten] not less than 10 days [of] before commencing attendance at such educational institution, register with the chief law enforcement officer of the municipality in which the educational institution is located or, if the municipality does not have a local police force, the Superintendent of State Police; (6)   A person who in another jurisdiction is required to register as a sex offender and who is employed or carries on a vocation in this State, on either a full-time or a part-time basis, with or without compensation, for more than 14 consecutive days or for an aggregate period exceeding 30 days in a calendar year, shall, [within ten] not less than 10 ten days [after] commencing such employment or vocation, register with the chief law enforcement officer of the municipality in which the employer is located or where the vocation is carried on, as the case may be, or, if the municipality does not have a local police force, the Superintendent of State Police; (7)   In addition to any other registration requirements set forth in this section, a person required to register under this act who is enrolled at, employed by or carries on a vocation at an institution of higher education or other post-secondary school in this State shall, within 10 days after commencing such attendance, employment or vocation, register with the law enforcement unit of the educational institution, if the institution has such a unit. d. (1) Upon a change of address, a person shall notify the law enforcement agency with which the person is registered and shall re-register with the appropriate law enforcement agency no less than 10 days before the person intends to first reside at the new address. Upon a change of employment or school enrollment status, a person shall notify the appropriate law enforcement agency no later than five days after any such change.  A person who fails to notify the appropriate law enforcement agency of a change of address or status in accordance with this subsection is guilty of a crime of the third degree. (2)   A person required to register under this act shall provide the appropriate law enforcement agency with information as to whether the person has routine access to or use of a computer or any other device with Internet capability. A person who fails to notify the appropriate law enforcement agency of such information or of a change in the person's access to or use of a computer or other device with Internet capability or who provides false information concerning the person's access to or use of a computer or any other device with Internet capability is guilty of a crime of the third degree. e.     A person required to register under paragraph (1) of subsection b. of this section or under paragraph (3) of subsection b. due to a sentence imposed on the basis of criteria similar to the criteria set forth in paragraph (1) of subsection b. shall verify the person's address with the appropriate law enforcement agency every 90 days in a manner prescribed by the Attorney General.  A person required to register under paragraph (2) of subsection b. of this section or under paragraph (3) of subsection b. on the basis of a conviction for an offense similar to an offense enumerated in paragraph (2) of subsection b. shall verify the person's address annually in a manner prescribed by the Attorney General.  In addition to address information, the person shall provide as part of the verification process any additional information the Attorney General may require. One year after the effective date of this act, the Attorney General shall review, evaluate and, if warranted, modify pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) the verification requirement.  Any person who knowingly provides false information concerning the person's place of residence or who fails to verify the person's address with the appropriate law enforcement agency or other entity, as prescribed by the Attorney General in accordance with this subsection, is guilty of a crime of the third degree. f.     Except as provided in subsection g. of this section, a person required to register under this act may make application to the Superior Court of this State to terminate the obligation upon proof that the person has not committed an offense within 15 years following conviction or release from a correctional facility for any term of imprisonment imposed, whichever is later, and is not likely to pose a threat to the safety of others. g.    A person required to register under this section who has been convicted of, adjudicated delinquent, or acquitted by reason of insanity for more than one sex offense as defined in subsection b. of this section or who has been convicted of, adjudicated delinquent, or acquitted by reason of insanity for aggravated sexual assault pursuant to subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:14-2 or sexual assault pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection c. of N.J.S.2C:14-2 is not eligible under subsection f. of this section to make application to the Superior Court of this State to terminate the registration obligation. (cf: P.L.2025, c.35, s.15) 2.    Section 3 of P.L.1994, c.128 (C.2C:7-8) is amended to read as follows: 3.    a.  After consultation with members of the advisory council established pursuant to section 6 of this act and within 60 days of the effective date, the Attorney General shall promulgate guidelines and procedures for the notification required pursuant to the provisions of this act.  The guidelines shall identify factors relevant to risk of re-offense and shall provide for three levels of notification depending upon the degree of the risk of re-offense. b.    Factors relevant to risk of re-offense shall include, but not be limited to, the following: (1)   Conditions of release that minimize risk of re-offense, including but not limited to whether the offender is under supervision of probation or parole; receiving counseling, therapy or treatment; or residing in a home situation that provides guidance and supervision; (2)   Physical conditions that minimize risk of re-offense, including but not limited to advanced age or debilitating illness; (3)   Criminal history factors indicative of high risk of re-offense, including: (a)   Whether the offender's conduct was found to be characterized by repetitive and compulsive behavior; (b)   Whether the offender served the maximum term; (c)   Whether the offender committed the sex offense against a child; (4)   Other criminal history factors to be considered in determining risk, including: (a)   The relationship between the offender and the victim; (b)   Whether the offense involved the use of a weapon, violence, or infliction of serious bodily injury; (c)   The number, date and nature of prior offenses; (5)   Whether psychological or psychiatric profiles indicate a risk of recidivism; (6)   The offender's response to treatment; (7)   Recent behavior, including behavior while confined or while under supervision in the community as well as behavior in the community following service of sentence; and (8)   Recent threats against persons or expressions of intent to commit additional crimes. c.     The regulations shall provide for three levels of notification depending upon the risk of re-offense by the offender as follows: (1)   If risk of re-offense is low, law enforcement agencies likely to encounter the person registered shall be notified; (2)   If risk of re-offense is moderate, organizations in the community including schools, religious and youth organizations shall be notified in accordance with the Attorney General's guidelines, in addition to the notice required by paragraph (1) of this subsection; (3)   If risk of re-offense is high, the public shall be notified through means in accordance with the Attorney General's guidelines designed to reach members of the public likely to encounter the person registered, in addition to the notice required by paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection. d.    In order to promote uniform application of the notification guidelines required by this section, the Attorney General shall develop procedures for evaluation of the risk of re-offense and implementation of community notification.  These procedures shall require, but not be limited to, the following: (1)   The county prosecutor of the county where the person was convicted and the county prosecutor of the county where the registered person will reside, together with any law enforcement officials that either deems appropriate, shall assess the risk of re-offense by the registered person; (2)   The county prosecutor of the county in which the registered person will reside, after consultation with local law enforcement officials, shall determine the means of providing notification. e.     The Attorney General's guidelines shall provide for the manner in which records of notification provided pursuant to this act shall be maintained and disclosed. f.     The Attorney General shall develop procedures for 1[the]1 county prosecutors to 1[utilize in] use when1 evaluating 1[the] 1sex offender registration records 1[of] from1 other jurisdictions and comparing those records with the factors relevant to the risk of re‑offense and any other criteria 1[utilized in determining] used to determine1 an offender's risk of re‑offense.  Whenever a sex offender who is registered in another jurisdiction 1[and intends to establish residence in this State]1 registers pursuant to 1paragraph (3) of subsection c. of1 section 2 of P.L.1994, c.133 (C.2C:7‑2), the county prosecutor shall evaluate the offender's registration record compiled by the other jurisdiction 1and make a determination regarding the offenders risk of re-offense1 prior to the offender 1[establishing residence] first residing or returning to this State1.  If the county prosecutor determines the offender's risk of re‑offense is moderate or high, notification shall be provided within 72 hours of the offender first residing in 1or returning to1 this State pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3) of subsection c. of this section, unless the offender requests judicial review of the prosecutor's determination.  1Requests for review shall be made using a form approved by the Administrative Director of the Courts.1 If the offender requests judicial review, a hearing shall be conducted on an expedited basis prior to notification. 1[Upon entering this State and until] Until1 the completion of judicial review, 1[the] an1 offender 1residing in this State1 shall be subject to continuous, satellite‑based monitoring 1in accordance with the Sex Offender Monitoring Act, P.L.2007, c.128 (C.30:4-123.89 et seq.).  The State Parole Board shall provide the offender with written notice of the conditions of monitoring and any fines, fees, or penalties that may be imposed for a violation of those conditions pursuant to Title 2C of the New Jersey Statutes, P.L.2007, c.128 (C.30:4-123.89 et seq.), or section 7 of P.L.2013, c.214 (C.30:4-123.97)1. (cf: P.L.1994, c.128, s.3) 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.